Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.234

Guardianship for dependent child—Dependency guardianship subsidies.

A dependency guardian who is a licensed foster parent at the time the guardianship is established under this chapter and who has been the child's foster parent for a minimum of six consecutive months preceding entry of the guardianship order may be eligible for a guardianship subsidy on behalf of the child.

[ 2010 c 272 s 15; 2009 c 235 s 6; 1994 c 288 s 9; 1981 c 195 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2009 c 235: See note following RCW 74.13.031.